Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 18.5
RESTITUTION IN CRIMINAL ACTIONS

Law reviews:

For article, "Restitution in

C

riminal

C

ases", see 30 Colo. Law. 125 (Oct. 2001).

Section

16-18.5-101. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1030, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-601.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-18.5-102. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1031, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-602.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-18.5-103. Assessment of restitution - corrective orders. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1032, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(7) added, p. 422, § 4, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

House Bill 02-1258 enacted subsection (7). This section as amended by House Bill 02-1258 was subsequently harmonized with House Bill 02-1046 and relocated to section 18-1.3-603.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-18.5-104. Initial collections investigation - payment schedule.

Orders for restitution shall be due and payable at the time that the order of conviction is entered. Unless the defendant is sentenced to the custody of the executive director of the department of corrections, if at the time that the court enters an order for restitution pursuant to section 18-1.3-603, C.R.S., the defendant alleges that he or she cannot pay the full amount of restitution, the court shall direct that the defendant report immediately to the collections investigator.

The time payment fee established in section 16-11-101.6 shall be assessed, and the associated provisions of section 16-11-101.6 shall apply to cases in which restitution is not paid in full on the date that it is imposed. The fee shall be collected from the defendant after the defendant has satisfied all orders for restitution. All payments for the time payment fee shall be credited to the judicial collection enhancement fund created in section 16-11-101.6 (2). In addition, reasonable costs incurred and collected by the state for restitution shall be credited to the fund.

Upon referral of a defendant pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the collections investigator shall conduct an investigation into the financial ability of the defendant to pay the restitution ordered by the court. Such investigation may consist of but is not limited to:

Submission of written financial affidavits or disclosures of the defendant's personal, household, and business income, assets, and liabilities;

Submission to an oral examination of the defendant's financial circumstances;

Submission of books, papers, documents, or other tangible things related to the defendant's financial circumstances including but not limited to:

Payroll stubs;

Financial institution account statements;

Stock certificates;

Deeds, titles, or other evidence of ownership;

State and federal tax records; and

Insurance policies and statements;

Research and verification of all oral and written statements made by the defendant.

In the case of a juvenile defendant, the collections investigator may conduct the investigation into the juvenile's parents' or legal guardian's financial circumstances as well as the juvenile's.

For purposes of conducting the investigation required by this subsection (3), the collections investigator shall have access to data maintained by other state agencies including but not limited to wage data, employment data, and income tax data. The judicial department and any other departments are authorized to enter into agreements for the sharing of such data.

Notwithstanding the provisions of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., documents and information obtained by the collections investigators pursuant to this subsection (3) shall not be public records, but shall be open to public inspection only upon an order of the court based on a finding of good cause. Documents and information obtained by the collection investigators may be made available to the victim and to any private collection agency or third party with whom the judicial department may contract for the collection of past due restitution. In addition, if any warrant is issued for the arrest of any defendant due to nonpayment of restitution, information concerning the defendant's address and place of employment may be shared with a criminal justice agency.

Following the investigation described in subsection (3) of this section, the collections investigator shall establish a payment schedule and direct that the defendant:
(4) (a) (I) Following the investigation described in subsection (3) of this section, the collections investigator shall establish a payment schedule and direct that the defendant:

Pay the full amount ordered immediately;

Pay the full amount ordered as a single payment on a specified date; or

Pay the full amount ordered in specified partial amounts on specified dates.

The collections investigator may ask the court to enter the payment schedule as an order of court.

In addition to the payments required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the collections investigator may direct that:

If the defendant is unemployed, the defendant seek gainful employment and report to the investigator on such efforts by a specified date;

The defendant shall not incur additional debt or financial obligation without the approval of the collections investigator, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld; or

The defendant promptly report to the collections investigator any changes in income, assets, or other financial circumstances.

Following the investigation required by subsection (3) of this section, the collections investigator may also:

Record a transcript of the order for restitution in the real estate records in the office of the clerk and recorder of any county in which the defendant holds an interest in real property. From the time of the recording of the transcript, there shall be a lien that is an encumbrance in favor of the state or the victim, or an assignee of the state or the victim, and shall encumber any interest of the defendant in real property in such county.

The lien created by this paragraph (a) shall remain in effect until all amounts of restitution, including interest, costs, time payment fees, and late fees are paid or for a period of twenty years after the recording of the transcript. So long as there is an amount still owing, the collections investigator or the victim or the assignee of the state or the victim may record a new transcript of the order of restitution. Any transcript of the order for restitution recorded pursuant to this subparagraph (II) prior to the expiration of the twenty-year period shall relate back to the date of the recording of the original transcript of the order for restitution and shall be valid for a period of twenty years after the recording of the subsequent transcript. More than one subsequent transcript shall be permitted.

Within twenty-one days after the payment of all such amounts of restitution, the collections investigator or the victim, or the assignee of the state or the victim, shall record a certificate of satisfaction of judgment issued by the clerk of the court with each clerk and recorder where a transcript was recorded. The satisfaction of judgment shall be conclusive evidence that the lien was extinguished.

The collections investigator and the victim shall be exempt from the payment of recording fees charged by the clerk and recorder for the recording of the transcripts and satisfactions of judgment.

File a transcript of the order for restitution with the secretary of state. From the time of the filing of the transcript, there shall be a lien that is an encumbrance in favor of the state or the victim, or an assignee of the state or the victim, and shall encumber any interest of the defendant in any personal property.

The lien created by this paragraph (b), shall remain in effect without the necessity of renewal for twelve years or until all amounts of restitution, including interest, costs, time payment fees, and late fees are paid. Within twenty-one days after the payment of all such amounts of restitution, the collections investigator or the victim, or the assignee of the state or the victim, shall file a satisfaction of judgment with the secretary of state. The satisfaction of judgment shall be conclusive evidence that the lien was extinguished.

The collections investigator and the victim shall be exempt from the payment of filing fees charged by the secretary of state.

File a transcript of the order for restitution with the authorized agent as defined in section 42-6-102 (1.5). From the time of the filing of the transcript, there shall be a lien that is an encumbrance in favor of the state or the victim, or an assignee of the state or the victim, and shall encumber any interest of the defendant in a motor vehicle. In order for such lien to be effective as a valid lien against a motor vehicle, the state or the victim, or the assignee of the state or the victim, shall have such lien filed for public record and noted on the owner's certificate of title in the manner provided in sections 42-6-121 and 42-6-129.

The lien created by this paragraph (c), shall remain in effect for the same period of time as any other lien on motor vehicles as specified in section 42-6-127, C.R.S., or until all amounts of restitution, including interest, costs, time payment fees, and late fees are paid, whichever occurs first. A lien created pursuant to this paragraph (c) may be renewed pursuant to section 42-6-127, C.R.S. Within twenty-one days after the payment of all such amounts of restitution, the collections investigator or the victim or the assignee of the state or the victim shall release the lien pursuant to the procedures specified in section 42-6-125, C.R.S. When a lien created by this paragraph (c) is released, the authorized agent and the executive director of the department of revenue shall proceed as provided in section 42-6-126, C.R.S.

The collections investigator and the victim shall not be exempt from the payment of filing fees charged by the authorized agent for the filing of either the transcript of order or the release of lien. However, the state or the victim, or the assignee of the state or the victim, may add the amount of the filing fees to the lien amount and collect the amount from the defendant.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1034, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1499, § 154, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5)(b) amended, p. 1673, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1076), ch. 178, p. 679, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(5)(a)(II)(B), (5)(b)(II), and (5)(c)(II) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 860, § 96, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(5)(c)(I) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1392, § 35, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-18.5-105. Monitoring - default - penalties.

The collections investigator shall be responsible for monitoring the payments of restitution by any defendant referred to the investigator pursuant to section 16-18.5-104. Based upon changes in the defendant's financial circumstances, the collections investigator may modify the payment schedule established pursuant to section 16-18.5-104 (4). If a payment schedule has been made an order of the court pursuant to section 16-18.5-104 (4)(a)(II), prior to enforcing a new schedule, the collections investigator shall request and obtain a modification of the order.

In addition to any other costs that may accrue, for each payment of restitution that a defendant fails to make within seven days after the date that the payment is due pursuant to any payment schedule established pursuant to this article, the late penalty fee established in section 16-11-101.6 shall be assessed, and the associated provisions of section 16-11-101.6 may apply. The late fees shall be collected from the defendant after the defendant has satisfied all orders for restitution. All payments for late fees shall be credited to the judicial collection enhancement fund created in section 16-11-101.6 (2).

Whenever a defendant fails to make a payment of restitution within seven days after the date that the payment is due pursuant to a payment schedule established pursuant to this article, in addition to any other remedy, the collections investigator may:

Conduct an additional financial investigation of the defendant as described in section 16-18.5-104 (3);

Issue an attachment of earnings requiring that a certain portion of a defendant's earnings, not to exceed fifty percent, be withheld and applied to any unpaid restitution, if such an attachment does not adversely impact the defendant's ability to comply with other orders of the court. An attachment of earnings under this paragraph (b) may be modified to a lesser or greater amount based upon changes in a defendant's circumstances as long as the amount withheld does not exceed fifty percent and may be suspended or canceled at the court's discretion. An attachment of earnings issued pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be enforceable in the same manner as a garnishment in a civil action. For purposes of this section, "earnings" shall have the same meaning as set forth for any type of garnishment in section 13-54.5-101, C.R.S., and shall include profits.

Request that the clerk of the court issue a writ of execution, writ of attachment, or other civil process to collect upon a judgment pursuant to article 52 of title 13, C.R.S.;

Request that the court issue a notice to show cause requiring the defendant to appear before the court and show cause why the required payment or payments were not made. Upon a finding of the defendant's failure to pay, unless the defendant establishes that he or she was unable to make the payments, the court may:

Revoke probation and impose any other sentence permitted by law;

Order that the defendant be confined to jail with a recommendation that the defendant participate in a work release program;

Extend the period of probation; or

Find the defendant in contempt of court and impose any authorized penalties for such action.

Employ any method available to collect state receivables, including the assignment of the defendant's accounts to a third party that has an agreement with the judicial department under this paragraph (e).

The judicial department may enter into agreements with third parties for collection-related services. Any fees or costs of the third parties shall be added to the amount of restitution owed by the defendant, but such fees and costs shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the amount collected.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1037, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1076), ch. 178, p. 679, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1395, § 10, effective June 7; (2) and IP(3) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 860, § 97, effective July 1.

16-18.5-106. Restitution for persons sentenced to the department of corrections.

Whenever a person is sentenced to the department of corrections, the department of corrections is authorized to conduct an investigation into the financial circumstances of the defendant, as described in section 16-18.5-104 (3), for purposes of determining the defendant's ability to pay court ordered costs, surcharges, restitution, time payment fees, late fees, and other fines, fees, or surcharges pursuant to section 16-18.5-110.

During any period of time that a defendant is a state inmate, as defined in section 17-1-102 (8), C.R.S., the executive director of the department of corrections, or his or her designee, may fix the time and manner of payment for court ordered costs, surcharges, restitution, time payment fees, late fees, and any other fines, fees, or surcharges pursuant to section 16-18.5-110 resulting from a criminal case or for child support, and may direct that a portion of the deposits into such inmate's bank account be applied to any outstanding balance existing before, on, or after September 1, 2000. At a minimum, the executive director shall order that twenty percent of all deposits into an inmate's bank account, including deposits for inmate pay shall be deducted and paid toward any outstanding order from a criminal case or for child support. If an inmate owes money on more than one order from a criminal case or for child support, the executive director may equitably apportion payments among the outstanding obligations.

(2.5) (a) The department of corrections shall intercept government windfall payments before the government windfall payments are made available in an inmate's bank account. The department of corrections shall send funds from intercepted government windfall payments to the judicial department in an amount equal to any amount owed by the inmate pursuant to section 16-18.5-110. The judicial department shall then disperse the funds in accordance with section 16-18.5-110. The department of corrections shall disperse any remaining funds in accordance with section 16-18.5-106. If any funds remain after all of the inmate's outstanding obligations are fulfilled, the excess funds must be placed in the inmate's bank account.

As used in this subsection (2.5), "government windfall payment" means an unusual payment from a governmental entity to an inmate in the department of corrections and includes economic stimulus payments and any other unusual government payments. "Government windfall payment" does not include payments to inmates for wages, pensions, disability payments, child support, tuition, restitution, and victim compensation.

Whenever a defendant is released from a correctional facility, the defendant shall be obligated to make payments for restitution as required by section 17-2-201 (5)(c)(I), C.R.S.

The department of corrections may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the judicial department or contract with a private collection agency for the collection of court ordered costs, surcharges, restitution, time payment fees, late fees, and any other fines, fees, or surcharges pursuant to section 16-18.5-110 from defendants sentenced to the department of corrections or released on parole.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1039, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 67, § 1, effective March 22; (2) amended, p. 1016, § 20, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(2.5) added, (SB 22-043), ch. 263, p. 1927, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) by Senate Bill 02-159 and Senate Bill 02-140 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-043, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

16-18.5-106.5. Lottery winnings offset - restitution.

The judicial department shall, on no less than a monthly basis, certify to the department of revenue information regarding any defendant who has been ordered to pay restitution pursuant to section 18-1.3-603 or 19-2.5-1104.

The information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall include the social security number of the person who is obligated to pay restitution and the amount of restitution due and owing. The department of revenue may request additional identifying information, as needed, from the judicial department in order to obtain an accurate data match pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Prior to the payment of lottery winnings required by rule and regulation of the Colorado lottery commission to be paid only at the lottery offices, the department of revenue shall check the social security number of each winner with those certified by the judicial department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If the name and associated social security number of a lottery winner appear among those certified, the department of revenue shall obtain the current address of the winner, shall suspend the payment of the winnings, and shall notify the judicial department. The notification shall include the name, home address, and social security number of the winner. The judicial department shall forward the notification to the court in which the lottery winner's restitution obligation is pending.

After receipt of the notification, the court shall notify the person that is obligated to pay restitution, in writing, that the state intends to offset the person's restitution obligation against his or her winnings from the state lottery. Such notification shall include information concerning the obligated person's right to object to the offset and to request an administrative review pursuant to the rules and regulations of the state court administrator.

The sole issues to be determined at the administrative review described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be:

Whether the person is required to pay restitution pursuant to an order entered by a court of this state; and

The amount of restitution outstanding.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 44-40-114, and upon the transfer of the amounts by the state treasurer to the court in which the restitution obligation is pending, the court shall disburse the amounts in accordance with this subsection (3).

The clerk of the court shall apply the amounts toward the outstanding restitution balance owed in the criminal or juvenile case. The clerk shall distribute the remainder, if any, to the person against whom the restitution order was entered. The court shall notify the crime victim or victims of actions taken under this paragraph (b).

The state court administrator shall promulgate rules and regulations, subject to the approval of the supreme court, establishing procedures to implement this section including but not limited to the process by which a lottery winner may object to an offset against restitution in accordance with paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

If a lottery winner owes restitution in a criminal or juvenile case and also owes a child support debt or arrearages as described in section 26-13-118 (1), the lottery winnings offset described in sections 26-13-118 and 44-40-113 (6) shall take priority and be applied first. Any remaining lottery winnings shall be disbursed and distributed in accordance with this section, section 44-40-113, and section 44-40-114.

The home addresses and social security numbers of persons subject to the state lottery winnings offset described in this section that are provided to the judicial department by the department of revenue shall be sent to the respective court.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 656, § 1, effective August 6; (3)(a) and (5) amended, p. 1275, § 71, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (3)(b), and (5) amended, p. 1257, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2018:

(3)(a) and (5) amended, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 363, § 8, effective October 1; (3)(a) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1699, § 16, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(5) amended, (HB 19-1128), ch. 238, p. 2358, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 714, § 28, effective October 1.

16-18.5-106.7. Unclaimed property offset - definition.

The judicial department may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state treasurer, acting as the administrator of unclaimed property under the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", article 13 of title 38, for the purpose of offsetting against a claim for unclaimed property the unpaid amount of restitution the person making the claim has been ordered to pay pursuant to section 18-1.3-603 or 19-2.5-1104. When an offset is to be made, the judicial department or the court in which the person's restitution obligation is pending shall notify the person in writing that the state intends to offset the amount of the person's unpaid restitution obligation against the person's claim for unclaimed property.

The state court administrator may adopt rules establishing the process by which an unclaimed property claimant may object to an offset and request an administrative review. The sole issues to be determined at the administrative review shall be whether the person is required to pay restitution pursuant to an order entered by a court of this state and the amount of the outstanding restitution.

For purposes of this section, "claim for unclaimed property" means a cash claim filed in accordance with section 38-13-903.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 698, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 466, § 6, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 714, § 29, effective October 1.

16-18.5-106.8. State income tax refund offsets - restitution - definitions.

In any case in which a defendant has an unsatisfied restitution obligation ordered pursuant to section 18-1.3-603 or 19-2.5-1104, the judicial department is authorized to transmit data concerning the obligation to the department of revenue for the purpose of conducting a data match and offsetting the restitution obligation against a state income tax refund pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3). For any restitution obligation identified by the judicial department for offset, the state court administrator shall:

On at least an annual basis, certify to the department of revenue the social security number of the defendant who is obligated to pay the restitution obligation and the amount of the outstanding restitution obligation. The department of revenue may request additional identifying information from the judicial department that is necessary to obtain an accurate data match.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of a data match, notify the appropriate court that a match has occurred and that an offset is pending and provide to the court the identifying information received from the department concerning the defendant whose state income tax refund is subject to the offset;

Provide or require the appropriate court to provide written notice to the defendant that the state intends to offset the defendant's restitution obligation against his or her state income tax refund and that the defendant has the right to object to the offset and request an administrative review; and

Upon receipt of funds for offset from the department of revenue, transmit the funds to the appropriate court.

The clerk of court shall apply funds received pursuant to this section to the defendant's outstanding restitution obligation. If the moneys received exceed the defendant's current restitution obligation, the excess may be applied to other financial obligations the defendant owes the court or the judicial department. If no other financial obligations are owed, the clerk of court shall refund any excess to the defendant.

The state court administrator may adopt rules establishing the process by which a defendant may object to an offset and request an administrative review. The sole issues to be determined at the administrative review shall be whether the person is required to pay the restitution and the amount of the outstanding restitution.

The department of revenue is authorized to receive data from the judicial department and execute offsets of state income tax refunds in accordance with this section and section 39-21-108 (3), C.R.S.

As used in this section, "defendant" means any person, including an adult or juvenile, who has been ordered to pay restitution pursuant to section 18-1.3-603 or 19-2.5-1104.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1258, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (5) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 715, § 30, effective October 1.

16-18.5-107. Collection of restitution by the victim.

Any victim in whose name a restitution order has been entered shall have a right to pursue collection of the amount of restitution owed to such person in such person's own name. Any victim who wishes to collect restitution pursuant to the provisions of this section shall first deliver to the clerk of the court or, if the defendant was sentenced to the department of corrections, to the executive director of the department of corrections a notice of intent to pursue collection. Upon receipt of notice of intent to pursue collection, the court, the collections investigator, and the department of corrections shall cease all attempts to collect the restitution due to the person or persons named in the notice, except that the collections investigator may still assist the victim in the victim's effort. The filing of a victim's intent to pursue collection and a victim's subsequent collection efforts do not alter a court's order that restitution is a condition of the defendant's probation, and such probation may still be revoked by the court upon a finding of failure to pay restitution.

Any victim who has filed a notice of intent to pursue collection may apply to the sentencing court for issuance of any of the following that, if provided, shall be provided without cost:

One or more certified copies of the transcript of the order for restitution;

An order that a portion of the defendant's earnings be withheld pursuant to section 16-18.5-105 (3)(b);

A writ of execution, writ of attachment, or other civil process to collect upon a judgment pursuant to article 52 of title 13, C.R.S.

If the victim chooses to record a copy of the transcript with a clerk and recorder or with the secretary of state, the victim may do so without charge.

A victim may withdraw his or her intent to pursue collection by filing a notice of such withdrawal with the person to whom the notice of intent was served pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Such notice shall state the amount, if any, of restitution collected by the victim. Upon receipt of a notice of withdrawal, the collections investigator or the department of corrections shall pursue collection of the restitution pursuant to this article.

The judicial department shall develop informational brochures for victims explaining the process of restitution and the victim's rights and remedies.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1039, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1674, § 10, effective July 1.

16-18.5-108. Dishonored check fee.

Whenever a payment of restitution that was presented in the form of a check or similar sight draft for the payment of money is subsequently dishonored by the financial institution for any reason upon presentment within thirty days after issue, the agency supervising the collection of such payment may assess a twenty dollar penalty against the defendant. The penalty provided in this section shall be assessed in addition to any other penalties or interest authorized by law.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1040, § 1, effective September 1.

16-18.5-109. Declined or unclaimed restitution.

If at the time that an order for restitution is entered no victim can be reasonably located or the victim declines to accept restitution, the defendant shall still pay restitution but such restitution shall be made to the state and distributed as provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 13-32-108 and 13-32-112, C.R.S., all restitution paid to the clerk of any court or into the registry of any court that has been unclaimed for a period of two years or more after the final determination of any case in which said restitution was collected or money deposited shall be distributed as provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

The amounts of restitution remaining undistributed pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be paid to the victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund created pursuant to section 24-4.2-103, C.R.S., and to the crime victim compensation fund created pursuant to section 24-4.1-117, C.R.S., in the judicial district in which the crime occurred. The chair of the victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement board, in consultation with the board, and the chair of the crime victim compensation board, in consultation with the board, in each judicial district shall designate on or before each December 1, starting December 1, 2000, how moneys received pursuant to this section shall be divided between the two funds during the next calendar year for that judicial district. If the chairs are unable to agree on a distribution, the crime victim services advisory board created in section 24-4.1-117.3 (1), C.R.S., shall designate how the moneys shall be divided between the funds for that judicial district. If no designation is made, the payments shall be made to the victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1041, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-047), ch. 129, p. 555, § 2, effective July 1.

16-18.5-110. Order of crediting payments.

Payments received shall be credited in the following order:

Costs for crime victim compensation fund, pursuant to section 24-4.1-119, C.R.S.;

Surcharges for victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund, pursuant to section 24-4.2-104, C.R.S.;

Restitution to victims in the following order:

A victim, as defined in section 18-1.3-602 (4)(a)(I), C.R.S.;

A victim, as defined in section 18-1.3-602 (4)(a)(II), C.R.S.;

A victim, as defined in section 18-1.3-602 (4)(a)(III), C.R.S.;

Surcharges related to the address confidentiality program pursuant to section 24-30-2114, C.R.S.;

Time payment fee;

Late fees; and

Any other fines, fees, or surcharges.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article added, p. 1041, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1050, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(c.5) added, p. 1699, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1884, § 24, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1)(c.5) amended, (HB 11-1080), ch. 256, p. 1123, § 5, effective June 2.

16-18.5-111. Effect of termination of deferred judgment and sentence or deferred adjudication, expungement, or sealing.

The provisions of this article apply notwithstanding the termination of a deferred judgment and sentence or a deferred adjudication, the entry of an order of expungement pursuant to section 19-1-306, C.R.S., or an order to seal entered pursuant to part 7 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1035), ch. 21, p. 152, § 1, effective March 7.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-065), ch. 277, p. 1143, § 4, effective July 1.

16-18.5-112. Effect of expungement.

Notwithstanding the entry of an order of expungement pursuant to section 19-1-306, the provisions of this article 18.5 apply.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1204), ch. 206, p. 784, § 3, effective November 1.

16-18.5-113. Office of restitution services - created.

There is created in the judicial department the office of restitution services, referred to in this section as the "office". The purpose of the office is to assist victims who are owed court-ordered restitution.

The office shall:

Receive requests from victims requesting semiannual statements as set forth in subsection (3) of this section;

Answer general questions and assist victims with case-specific questions related to court-ordered restitution;

Create and maintain a web page on the judicial department website with resources and information on court-ordered restitution;

Assist with training related to the administration of the restitution system;

Enhance communications for postsentence restitution; and

Collaborate with victim advocacy programs.

A victim who is owed court-ordered restitution may submit a request to the office to provide semiannual statements detailing the restitution payments the defendant has made to the victim and the disbursements the court has made to the victim. The statement must include the outstanding amount of court-ordered restitution owed to the victim.

The office shall verify the identity of the victim making the request described in subsection (3)(a) of this section to ensure the victim is owed court-ordered restitution for the case.

The office shall not provide information related to court-ordered restitution to other victims in the same case or in other cases in which the victim requests a semiannual statement pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-043), ch. 263, p. 1928, § 5, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-043, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.